Florida, session 2026, SB1566.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Florida: 87 88 Section 1.âThis act may be cited as the âLocal Government 89 Financial Transparency and Accountability Act.â 90 Section 2.âPresent paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of 91 section 129.03, Florida Statutes, is redesignated as paragraph 92 (f) of that subsection, a new paragraph (d) and paragraphs (e), 93 (g), and (h) are added to subsection (3) of that section, and 94 paragraph (c) and present paragraph (d) of subsection (3) of 95 that section are amended, to read: 96 129.03âPreparation and adoption of budget.â 97 (3)âThe county budget officer, after tentatively 98 ascertaining the proposed fiscal policies of the board for the 99 next fiscal year, shall prepare and present to the board a 100 tentative budget for the next fiscal year for each of the funds 101 provided in this chapter, including all estimated receipts, 102 taxes to be levied, and balances expected to be brought forward 103 and all estimated expenditures, reserves, and balances to be 104 carried over at the end of the year. 105 (c)âThe board shall hold public hearings to adopt tentative 106 and final budgets pursuant to s. 200.065. The hearings shall be 107 primarily for the purpose of hearing requests and complaints 108 from the public regarding the budgets and the proposed tax 109 levies and for explaining the budget and any proposed or adopted 110 amendments. The tentative budget must be posted on the countyâs 111 official website at least 5 2 days before the public hearing to 112 consider such budget and must remain on the website for at least 113 45 days. The final budget must be posted on the website within 114 30 days after adoption and must remain on the website for at 115 least 5 2 years. The tentative budgets, adopted tentative 116 budgets, and final budgets shall be filed in the office of the 117 county auditor as a public record. Sufficient reference in words 118 and figures to identify the particular transactions must be made 119 in the minutes of the board to record its actions with reference 120 to the budgets. 121 (d)âThe county shall hold a budget workshop at which the 122 board shall perform a budget reduction exercise, identifying 123 strategies to potentially reduce the ensuing fiscal year budget 124 by 10 percent in comparison to the current year budget without 125 compromising essential public services, such as law enforcement 126 or fire services, or legal obligations. The county shall post 127 such exercise on the countyâs official website in a portable 128 document format or a similar electronically accessible form that 129 can be downloaded and is independent of the original software 130 and hardware used to create the document, or a link to a 131 recording of the budget workshop. The budget reduction exercise 132 must occur at least 14 days before final budget adoption. 133 (e)âEach tentative budget, adopted tentative budget, and 134 final budget must be posted on the countyâs official website. 135 The budget must be posted in a portable document format or a 136 similar electronically accessible form that can be downloaded 137 and may be independent of the original software and hardware 138 used to create the document. At a minimum, the posted budgets 139 must include all of the following information for the proposed 140 fiscal year, the current fiscal year, and the preceding 4 fiscal 141 years: 142 1.âBudget overview and summary, including a narrative 143 analysis that also utilizes graphical illustrations to highlight 144 major points of emphasis and trends. 145 2.âAn overall countywide summary of revenue and 146 expenditures. 147 3.âA summary of revenue and expenditures by fund. 148 4.âA summary of expenses by department and division. 149 5.âA summary of expenses by program or function. 150 6.âA summary of expenses related to debt obligations. 151 7.âA summary of expenses related to capital projects. 152 8.âAn organizational chart or staffing summary. 153 9.âA summary and analysis of county reserves and fund 154 balances. 155 (f)(d)âBy each October 15, the county budget officer shall 156 electronically submit the following information regarding the 157 final budget and the countyâs economic status to the Office of 158 Economic and Demographic Research in the format specified by the 159 office: 160 1.âGovernment spending per resident, including, at a 161 minimum, the spending per resident for the previous 5 fiscal 162 years. 163 2.âGovernment debt per resident, including, at a minimum, 164 the debt per resident for the previous 5 fiscal years. 165 3.âMedian income within the county. 166 4.âThe average county employee salary. 167 5.âPercent of budget spent on salaries and benefits for 168 county employees. 169 6.âNumber of special taxing districts, wholly or partially, 170 within the county. 171 7.âAnnual county expenditures providing for the financing, 172 acquisition, construction, reconstruction, or rehabilitation of 173 housing that is affordable, as that term is defined in s. 174 420.0004. The reported expenditures must indicate the source of 175 such funds as âfederal,â âstate,â âlocal,â or âother,â as 176 applicable. The information required by this subparagraph must 177 be included in the submission due by October 15, 2020, and each 178 annual submission thereafter. 179 (g)âEach county shall prepare a quarterly summary of 180 compensation for all employees funded with appropriations from 181 the county. The summary must include job titles, names, and 182 salaries for each employee. The summary must be posted on the 183 countyâs official website in a portable document format or a 184 similar electronically accessible form that can be downloaded 185 and may be independent of the original software and hardware 186 used to create the document. 187 (h)1.âEach county shall publish a budget development 188 calendar for the ensuing fiscal year. The calendar must list, to 189 the extent practicable, all of the following budget-related 190 events: 191 a.âThe expected timeframe for county agencies to submit 192 their proposed budget requests, including the name of the county 193 agency or county budget officer to whom such requests must be 194 submitted. 195 b.âThe expected timeframe for constitutional county 196 officers listed in s. 1(d), Art. VIII of the State Constitution 197 to submit their tentative budgets to the board of county 198 commissioners under subsection (2). 199 c.âThe expected timeframe in which the county property 200 appraiser is expected to submit to the county budget officer his 201 or her estimate of total valuations against which taxes may be 202 levied as described in subsection (1). 203 d.âAn expected timeframe for holding any budget workshops 204 at which the board of county commissioners may discuss the 205 ensuing county budget, county agency funding requests, or the 206 budgets of constitutional county officers. 207 e.âThe expected timeframe in which the budget public 208 hearings required under s. 200.065 may be held. 209 f.âThe expected timeframe by which the county will hold a 210 budget workshop at which the board of county commissioners will 211 perform the budget reduction exercise required by paragraph (d). 212 2.âThe budget development calendar must be published on the 213 countyâs website on or before January 30 of each calendar year. 214 However, the publication of the budget development calendar may 215 not serve as a basis for bringing any civil or equitable action 216 challenging the adoption of a countyâs tentative or final 217 budgets pursuant to s. 129.01 or s. 200.065. 218 Section 3.âParagraph (f) of subsection (2) of section 219 129.06, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 220 129.06âExecution and amendment of budget.â 221 (2)âThe board at any time within a fiscal year may amend a 222 budget for that year, and may within the first 60 days of a 223 fiscal year amend the budget for the prior fiscal year, as 224 follows: 225 (f)âUnless otherwise prohibited by law, if an amendment to 226 a budget is required for a purpose not specifically authorized 227 in paragraphs (a)-(e), the amendment may be authorized by 228 resolution or ordinance of the board of county commissioners 229 adopted following a public hearing. 230 1.âThe public hearing must be advertised at least 2 days, 231 but not more than 5 days, before the date of the hearing. The 232 advertisement must appear in a newspaper of paid general 233 circulation and must identify the name of the taxing authority, 234 the date, place, and time of the hearing, and the purpose of the 235 hearing. The advertisement must also identify each budgetary 236 fund to be amended, the source of the funds, the use of the 237 funds, and the total amount of each fundâs appropriations. 238 2.âThe proposed amendment must be posted on the countyâs 239 official website 5 days before the adoption of the amendment. If 240 the board amends the budget pursuant to this paragraph, the 241 adopted amendment must be posted on the countyâs official 242 website within 5 days after adoption and must remain on the 243 website for at least 5 2 years. 244 Section 4.âPresent subsections (22) through (38) and (39) 245 through (54) of section 163.3164, Florida Statutes, are 246 redesignated as subsections (23) through (39) and (41) through 247 (56), respectively, and new subsections (22) and (40) are added 248 to that section, to read: 249 163.3164âCommunity Planning Act; definitions.âAs used in 250 this act: 251 (22)ââImpact feeâ means a one-time charge imposed by a 252 local government on new development to fund the capital costs of 253 public infrastructure needed to serve that development. 254 (40)ââPlan-based methodologyâ means a study methodology 255 that uses the most recent and localized data to project growth 256 within a jurisdiction over a 10-year period, anticipate capacity 257 impacts on relevant systems which will be created by the 258 projected growth, and establish a list of capital projects to be 259 constructed or purchased in a defined time period to mitigate 260 the anticipated capacity impacts as part of a new or updated 261 impact fee study. The capital projects identified in a county or 262 municipal impact fee study and any necessary interlocal 263 agreement must comport with the requirements of s. 264 163.3177(6)(h). 265 Section 5.âParagraphs (i) and (j) of subsection (5) of 266 section 163.3180, Florida Statutes, are amended to read: 267 163.3180âConcurrency.â 268 (5) 269 (i)âIf a local government elects to repeal transportation 270 concurrency, the local government may adopt an alternative 271 transportation system that is mobility-plan and fee-based or an 272 alternative transportation system that is not mobility-plan and 273 fee-based, including impact fees. The local government may not 274 use an alternative transportation system to deny, time, or phase 275 an application for site plan approval, plat approval, final 276 subdivision approval, building permits, or the functional 277 equivalent of such approvals provided that the developer agrees 278 to pay for the developmentâs identified transportation impacts 279 via the funding mechanism implemented by the local government. 280 The revenue from the funding mechanism used in the alternative 281 transportation system must be used to implement the needs of the 282 local governmentâs plan which serves as the basis for the fee 283 imposed. An alternative transportation system must comply with 284 s. 163.31801 governing impact fees. An alternative 285 transportation system may not impose upon new development any 286 responsibility for funding an existing transportation deficiency 287 as defined in paragraph (h). This section does not require a 288 local government to adopt a mobility fee in lieu of an impact 289 fee for transportation. 290 (j)1.âIf a county and municipality charge the developer of 291 a new development or redevelopment a fee for transportation 292 capacity impacts, the county and municipality must create and 293 execute an interlocal agreement to coordinate the mitigation of 294 their respective transportation capacity impacts. 295 2.âThe interlocal agreement must, at a minimum: 296 a.âEnsure that any new development or redevelopment is not 297 charged twice for the same transportation capacity impacts. 298 b.âEstablish a plan-based methodology for determining the 299 legally permissible fee to be charged to a new development or 300 redevelopment. 301 c.âRequire the county or municipality issuing the building 302 permit to collect the fee, unless agreed to otherwise. 303 d.âProvide a method for the proportionate distribution of 304 the revenue collected by the county or municipality to address 305 the transportation capacity impacts of a new development or 306 redevelopment, or provide a method of assigning responsibility 307 for the mitigation of the transportation capacity impacts 308 belonging to the county and the municipality. 309 3.âBy October 1, 2025, if an interlocal agreement is not 310 executed pursuant to this paragraph: 311 a.âThe fee charged to a new development or redevelopment 312 shall be based on the transportation capacity impacts 313 apportioned to the county and municipality as identified in the 314 developerâs traffic impact study or the mobility plan adopted by 315 the county or municipality. 316 b.âThe developer shall receive a 10 percent reduction in 317 the total fee calculated pursuant to sub-subparagraph a. 318 c.âThe county or municipality issuing the building permit 319 must collect the fee charged pursuant to sub-subparagraphs a. 320 and b. and distribute the proceeds of such fee to the county and 321 municipality within 60 days after the developerâs payment. 322 4.âThis paragraph does not apply to: 323 a.âA county as defined in s. 125.011(1). 324 b.âA county or municipality that has entered into, or 325 otherwise updated, an existing interlocal agreement, as of 326 October 1, 2024, to coordinate the mitigation of transportation 327 impacts. However, if such existing interlocal agreement is 328 terminated, the affected county and municipality that have 329 entered into the agreement are shall be subject to the 330 requirements of this paragraph. An interlocal agreement entered 331 into before October 1, 2024, may not extend beyond October 1, 332 2031 unless the county and municipality mutually agree to extend 333 the existing interlocal agreement before the expiration of the 334 agreement. 335 Section 6.âPresent paragraphs (a) and (b) of subsection (3) 336 of section 163.31801, Florida Statutes, are redesignated as 337 paragraphs (b) and (c), respectively, a new paragraph (a) is 338 added to that subsection, subsection (15) is added to that 339 section, and subsection (4) and paragraph (g) of subsection (6) 340 of that section are amended, to read: 341 163.31801âImpact fees; short title; intent; minimum 342 requirements; audits; challenges.â 343 (3)âFor purposes of this section, the term: 344 (a)ââExtraordinary circumstancesâ means measurable effects 345 of development which will require mitigation by the affected 346 local government, school district, or special district and which 347 exceed the total of the current adopted impact fee amount and 348 any increase as provided in paragraphs (6)(c), (d), and (e) in 349 less than 4 years. 350 (4)âFor impact fees adopted or increased after July 1, 351 2026, at a minimum, each local government that adopts and 352 collects an impact fee by ordinance and each special district 353 that adopts, collects, and administers an impact fee by 354 resolution must: 355 (a)âEnsure that the calculation of the impact fee is based 356 on a demonstrated-need study that is plan-based and uses using 357 the most recent and localized data available within 4 years of 358 the current impact fee update. The new study must be adopted by 359 the local government within 12 months of the initiation of the 360 new impact fee study if the local government increases the 361 impact fee. 362 (b)âProvide for accounting and reporting of impact fee 363 collections and expenditures and account for the revenues and 364 expenditures of such impact fee in a separate accounting fund. 365 (c)âLimit administrative charges for the collection of 366 impact fees to actual costs. 367 (d)âProvide notice at least 90 days before the effective 368 date of an ordinance or resolution imposing a new or increased 369 impact fee. A local government is not required to wait 90 days 370 to decrease, suspend, or eliminate an impact fee. Unless the 371 result is to reduce the total mitigation costs or impact fees 372 imposed on an applicant, new or increased impact fees may not 373 apply to current or pending permit applications submitted before 374 the effective date of a new or increased impact fee. 375 (e)âEnsure that collection of the impact fee may not be 376 required to occur earlier than the date of issuance of the 377 building permit for the property that is subject to the fee. 378 (f)âEnsure that the impact fee is proportional and 379 reasonably connected to, or has a rational nexus with, the need 380 for additional capital facilities and the increased impact 381 generated by the new residential or commercial construction. 382 (g)âEnsure that the impact fee is proportional and 383 reasonably connected to, or has a rational nexus with, the 384 expenditures of the funds collected and the benefits accruing to 385 the new residential or nonresidential construction. 386 (h)âSpecifically earmark funds collected under the impact 387 fee for use in acquiring, constructing, or improving capital 388 facilities to benefit new users. 389 (i)âEnsure that revenues generated by the impact fee are 390 not used, in whole or in part, to pay existing debt or for 391 previously approved projects unless the expenditure is 392 reasonably connected to, or has a rational nexus with, the 393 increased impact generated by the new residential or 394 nonresidential construction. 395 (6)âA local government, school district, or special 396 district may increase an impact fee only as provided in this 397 subsection. 398 (g)1.âA local government, school district, or special 399 district may increase an impact fee rate beyond the phase-in 400 limitations established under paragraph (b), paragraph (c), 401 paragraph (d), or paragraph (e) by establishing the need for 402 such increase in full compliance with the requirements of 403 subsection (4), provided the following criteria are met: 404 a.âA demonstrated-need study using a plan-based methodology 405 which justifies justifying any increase in excess of those 406 authorized in paragraph (b), paragraph (c), paragraph (d), or 407 paragraph (e) has been completed within the 12 months before the 408 adoption of the impact fee increase and expressly demonstrates 409 the extraordinary circumstances necessitating the need to exceed 410 the phase-in limitations. The capacity standards used to support 411 the existence of such extraordinary circumstances must be 412 specified in the impact fee study adopted under paragraph 413 (4)(a). The demonstrated-need study must be accompanied by a 414 declaration stating how and the timeframe during which the 415 proposed impact fee increase will be used to construct or 416 purchase the improvements necessary to increase capacity. The 417 local government, school district, or special district must use 418 localized data reflecting differences in costs and modality of 419 projects between urban, emerging urban, and rural areas, as 420 applicable within the study area, to project the anticipated 421 growth or capacity impacts that underlie the extraordinary 422 circumstances necessitating the impact fee increase. 423 b.âThe local government jurisdiction has held at least two 424 publicly noticed workshops dedicated to the extraordinary 425 circumstances necessitating the need to exceed the phase-in 426 limitations set forth in paragraph (b), paragraph (c), paragraph 427 (d), or paragraph (e). 428 c.âThe impact fee increase ordinance is approved by a 429 unanimous vote of the governing body. 430 2.âAn impact fee increase approved under this paragraph 431 must be implemented in at least two but not more than four equal 432 annual increments beginning with the date on which the impact 433 fee increase ordinance is adopted. 434 3.âA local government, school district, or special district 435 may not: 436 a.âIncrease an impact fee rate beyond the phase-in 437 limitations under this paragraph if the local government, school 438 district, or special district has not increased the impact fee 439 within the past 5 years. Any year in which the local government, 440 school district, or special district is prohibited from 441 increasing an impact fee because the jurisdiction is in a 442 hurricane disaster area is not included in the 5-year period. 443 b.âUse data that is more than 4 years old to demonstrate 444 extraordinary circumstances. 445 c.âInclude in the impact fee increase any deduction 446 authorized by a previous or existing impact fee. 447 d.âIncrease an impact fee rate beyond the phase-in 448 limitations under this paragraph by more than 100 percent 449 divided equally over a 4-year period. 450 (15)âWhen an impact fee payor submits a written request to 451 the chief administrative officer of a local government, school 452 district, or special district for a refund or credit from 453 alleged overpayment of an impact fee, the local government, 454 school district, or special district that levied the impact fee 455 shall provide a written approval or denial to the payor within 456 30 days after receiving the written request. If the local 457 government, school district, or special district approves the 458 payorâs request, the impact fee payor may, at the payorâs 459 discretion, elect to receive either a refund or a credit. The 460 impact fee payor has 30 days after receipt of the written 461 response from the local government, school district, or special 462 district to provide written notice to the chief administrator of 463 the local government, school district, or special district of 464 the payorâs election. It is the intent of the Legislature that 465 the impact fee payor elect a credit if the payor has the 466 reasonable opportunity to use the credit, in accordance with 467 law. A full refund or credit of the impact fee must be provided 468 to the payor within 30 days after the chief administrator 469 receives the payorâs written election. A request or response 470 provided in accordance with this subsection may not be used as 471 an admission against interest of either party in any subsequent 472 action challenging the impact fee. 473 Section 7.âPresent subsections (4) through (9) of section 474 166.241, Florida Statutes are redesignated as subsections (5) 475 through (10), respectively, a new subsection (4) and subsections 476 (11) and (12) are added to that section, and subsection (3) and 477 present subsection (7), paragraph (c) of present subsection (8), 478 and present subsection (9) of that section are amended, to read: 479 166.241âFiscal years, budgets, appeal of municipal law 480 enforcement agency budget, and budget amendments.â 481 (3)(a)âThe tentative budget must be posted on the 482 municipalityâs official website at least 5 2 days before the 483 budget hearing, held pursuant to s. 200.065 or other law, to 484 consider such budget and must remain on the website for at least 485 45 days. The final adopted budget must be posted on the 486 municipalityâs official website within 30 days after adoption 487 and must remain on the website for at least 5 2 years. If the 488 municipality does not operate an official website, the 489 municipality must, within a reasonable period of time as 490 established by the county or counties in which the municipality 491 is located, transmit the tentative budget and final budget to 492 the manager or administrator of such county or counties who 493 shall post the budgets on the countyâs website. 494 (b)âThe municipality shall hold a budget workshop at which 495 the governing body of the municipality shall perform a budget 496 reduction exercise, identifying strategies to potentially reduce 497 the ensuing fiscal year budget by 10 percent in comparison to 498 the current year budget without compromising essential public 499 services, such as law enforcement or fire services, or legal 500 obligations. The municipality shall post such exercise on the 501 municipalityâs official website or the countyâs official 502 website, as applicable, in a portable document format or a 503 similar electronically accessible form that can be downloaded 504 and is independent of the original software and hardware used to 505 create the document, or a link to a recording of the budget 506 workshop. The budget reduction exercise must occur at least 14 507 days before final budget adoption. 508 (4)âEach tentative budget, adopted tentative budget, or 509 final budget must be posted on the municipalityâs official 510 website or the countyâs official website, as applicable. The 511 budget must be posted in a portable document format or a similar 512 electronically accessible form that can be downloaded and may be 513 independent of the original software and hardware used to create 514 the document. At a minimum, the posted budgets must include all 515 of the following information for the proposed fiscal year, the 516 current fiscal year, and the preceding 4 fiscal years: 517 (a)âBudget overview and summary, including a narrative 518 analysis that also utilizes graphical illustrations to highlight 519 major points of emphasis and trends. 520 (b)âAn overall municipal summary of revenue and 521 expenditures. 522 (c)âA summary of revenue and expenditures by fund. 523 (d)âA summary of expenses by department and division. 524 (e)âA summary of expenses by program or function. 525 (f)âA summary of expenses related to debt obligations. 526 (g)âA summary of expenses related to capital projects. 527 (h)âAn organizational chart or staffing summary. 528 (i)âA summary and analysis of municipal reserves and fund 529 balances. 530 (8)(7)âBy each October 15, the municipal budget officer 531 shall electronically submit the following information regarding 532 the final budget and the municipalityâs economic status to the 533 Office of Economic and Demographic Research in the format 534 specified by the office: 535 (a)âGovernment spending per resident, including, at a 536 minimum, the spending per resident for the previous 5 fiscal 537 years. 538 (b)âGovernment debt per resident, including, at a minimum, 539 the debt per resident for the previous 5 fiscal years. 540 (c)âAverage municipal employee salary. 541 (d)âMedian income within the municipality. 542 (e)âNumber of special taxing districts wholly or partially 543 within the municipality. 544 (f)âPercent of budget spent on salaries and benefits for 545 municipal employees. 546 (g)âAnnual municipal expenditures providing for the 547 financing, acquisition, construction, reconstruction, or 548 rehabilitation of housing that is affordable, as that term is 549 defined in s. 420.0004. The reported expenditures must indicate 550 the source of such funds as âfederal,â âstate,â âlocal,â or 551 âother,â as applicable. This information must be included in the 552 submission due by October 15, 2020, and each annual submission 553 thereafter. 554 (9)(8)âThe governing body of each municipality at any time 555 within a fiscal year or within 60 days following the end of the 556 fiscal year may amend a budget for that year as follows: 557 (c)âIf a budget amendment is required for a purpose not 558 specifically authorized in paragraph (a) or paragraph (b), the 559 budget amendment must be adopted in the same manner as the 560 original budget unless otherwise specified in the municipalityâs 561 charter. The proposed amendment must be posted on the 562 municipalityâs official website 5 days before the adoption of 563 the amendment. If the municipality does not operate an official 564 website, the municipality must, within a reasonable period of 565 time as established by the county or counties in which the 566 municipality is located, transmit the proposed amendment to the 567 manager or administrator of such county or counties who shall 568 post the proposed amendment on the countyâs website 5 days 569 before the adoption of the amendment. 570 (10)(9)âIf the governing body of a municipality amends the 571 budget pursuant to paragraph (9)(c) (8)(c), the adopted 572 amendment must be posted on the official website of the 573 municipality within 5 days after adoption and must remain on the 574 municipalityâs website or the countyâs website, as applicable, 575 for at least 5 2 years. If the municipality does not operate an 576 official website, the municipality must, within a reasonable 577 period of time as established by the county or counties in which 578 the municipality is located, transmit the adopted amendment to 579 the manager or administrator of such county or counties who 580 shall post the adopted amendment on the countyâs website. 581 (11)âEach municipality shall prepare a quarterly summary of 582 compensation for all employees funded with appropriations from 583 the municipality. The summary must include job titles, names, 584 and salaries for each employee. The summary must be posted on 585 the municipalityâs official website or the countyâs official 586 website, as applicable, in a portable document format or a 587 similar electronically accessible form that can be downloaded 588 and may be independent of the original software and hardware 589 used to create the document. If the municipality does not 590 operate an official website, the municipality must, within a 591 reasonable period of time as established by the county or 592 counties in which the municipality is located, transmit the 593 summary to the manager or administrator of such county or 594 counties who shall post the summary on the countyâs website. 595 (12)(a)âEach municipality shall publish a budget 596 development calendar for the ensuing fiscal year. The calendar 597 must list, to the extent practicable, all of the following 598 budget related events: 599 1.âThe expected timeframe for municipal agencies to submit 600 their proposed budget requests, including the name of the 601 municipal agency or budget officer to whom such requests must be 602 submitted. 603 2.âThe expected timeframe by which the county property 604 appraiser is expected to submit to the municipality the taxable 605 value within the jurisdiction of the municipality under s. 606 200.065. 607 3.âAn expected timeframe for holding any budget workshops 608 at which the municipalityâs governing body may discuss the 609 ensuing fiscal year budget or the funding requests of the 610 municipalityâs agencies or governmental units. 611 4.âThe expected timeframe in which the budget public 612 hearings required under s. 200.065 may be held. 613 5.âThe expected timeframe by which the municipality will 614 hold a budget workshop at which the council or commission will 615 perform the budget reduction exercise required by paragraph 616 (3)(b). 617 (b)âThe budget development calendar must be published on 618 the municipalityâs official website or the countyâs official 619 website, as applicable, on or before January 30 of each calendar 620 year. If the municipality does not operate an official website, 621 the municipality must, within a reasonable period of time as 622 established by the county or counties in which the municipality 623 is located, transmit the budget development calendar to the 624 manager or administrator of such county or counties who shall 625 post the municipalityâs budget development calendar on the 626 countyâs website. However, the publication of the budget 627 development calendar may not serve as a basis for bringing any 628 civil or equitable action challenging the adoption of the 629 municipalityâs tentative or final budget pursuant to this 630 section or s. 200.065. 631 Section 8.âParagraph (d) of subsection (2) of section 632 212.055, Florida Statutes, is amended to read: 633 212.055âDiscretionary sales surtaxes; legislative intent; 634 authorization and use of proceeds.âIt is the legislative intent 635 that any authorization for imposition of a discretionary sales 636 surtax shall be published in the Florida Statutes as a 637 subsection of this section, irrespective of the duration of the 638 levy. Each enactment shall specify the types of counties 639 authorized to levy; the rate or rates which may be imposed; the 640 maximum length of time the surtax may be imposed, if any; the 641 procedure which must be followed to secure voter approval, if 642 required; the purpose for which the proceeds may be expended; 643 and such other requirements as the Legislature may provide. 644 Taxable transactions and administrative procedures shall be as 645 provided in s. 212.054. 646 (2)âLOCAL GOVERNMENT INFRASTRUCTURE SURTAX.â 647 (d)âThe proceeds of the surtax authorized by this 648 subsection and any accrued interest shall be expended by the 649 school district, within the county and municipalities within the 650 county, or, in the case of a negotiated joint county agreement, 651 within another county, to finance, plan, and construct 652 infrastructure; to acquire any interest in land for public 653 recreation, conservation, or protection of natural resources or 654 to prevent or satisfy private property rights claims resulting 655 from limitations imposed by the designation of an area of 656 critical state concern; to provide loans, grants, or rebates to 657 residential or commercial property owners who make energy 658 efficiency improvements to their residential or commercial 659 property, if a local government ordinance authorizing such use 660 is approved by referendum; or to finance the closure of county 661 owned or municipally owned solid waste landfills that have been 662 closed or are required to be closed by order of the Department 663 of Environmental Protection. Any use of the proceeds or interest 664 for purposes of landfill closure before July 1, 1993, is 665 ratified. The proceeds and any interest may not be used for the 666 operational expenses of infrastructure, except that a county 667 that has a population of fewer than 75,000 and that is required 668 to close a landfill may use the proceeds or interest for long 669 term maintenance costs associated with landfill closure. 670 Counties, as defined in s. 125.011, and charter counties may, in 671 addition, use the proceeds or interest to retire or service 672 indebtedness incurred for bonds issued before July 1, 1987, for 673 infrastructure purposes, and for bonds subsequently issued to 674 refund such bonds. Any use of the proceeds or interest for 675 purposes of retiring or servicing indebtedness incurred for 676 refunding bonds before July 1, 1999, is ratified. 677 1.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term 678 âinfrastructureâ means: 679 a.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 680 associated with the construction, reconstruction, or improvement 681 of public facilities that have a life expectancy of 5 or more 682 years, any related land acquisition, land improvement, design, 683 and engineering costs, and all other professional and related 684 costs required to bring the public facilities into service. For 685 purposes of this sub-subparagraph, the term âpublic facilitiesâ 686 means facilities as defined in s. 163.3164(43) s. 163.3164(41), 687 s. 163.3221(13), or s. 189.012(5), and includes facilities that 688 are necessary to carry out governmental purposes, including, but 689 not limited to, fire stations, general governmental office 690 buildings, and animal shelters, regardless of whether the 691 facilities are owned by the local taxing authority or another 692 governmental entity. 693 b.âA fire department vehicle, an emergency medical service 694 vehicle, a sheriffâs office vehicle, a police department 695 vehicle, or any other vehicle, and the equipment necessary to 696 outfit the vehicle for its official use or equipment that has a 697 life expectancy of at least 5 years. 698 c.âAny expenditure for the construction, lease, or 699 maintenance of, or provision of utilities or security for, 700 facilities, as defined in s. 29.008. 701 d.âAny fixed capital expenditure or fixed capital outlay 702 associated with the improvement of private facilities that have 703 a life expectancy of 5 or more years and that the owner agrees 704 to make available for use on a temporary basis as needed by a 705 local government as a public emergency shelter or a staging area 706 for emergency response equipment during an emergency officially 707 declared by the state or by the local government under s. 708 252.38. Such improvements are limited to those necessary to 709 comply with current standards for public emergency evacuation 710 shelters. The owner must enter into a written contract with the 711 local government providing the improvement funding to make the 712 private facility available to the public for purposes of 713 emergency shelter at no cost to the local government for a 714 minimum of 10 years after completion of the improvement, with 715 the provision that the obligation will transfer to any 716 subsequent owner until the end of the minimum period. 717 e.âAny land acquisition expenditure for a residential 718 housing project in which at least 30 percent of the units are 719 affordable to individuals or families whose total annual 720 household income does not exceed 120 percent of the area median 721 income adjusted for household size, if the land is owned by a 722 local government or by a special district that enters into a 723 written agreement with the local government to provide such 724 housing. The local government or special district may enter into 725 a ground lease with a public or private person or entity for 726 nominal or other consideration for the construction of the 727 residential housing project on land acquired pursuant to this 728 sub-subparagraph. 729 f.âInstructional technology used solely in a school 730 districtâs classrooms. As used in this sub-subparagraph, the 731 term âinstructional technologyâ means an interactive device that 732 assists a teacher in instructing a class or a group of students 733 and includes the necessary hardware and software to operate the 734 interactive device. The term also includes support systems in 735 which an interactive device may mount and is not required to be 736 affixed to the facilities. 737 2.âFor the purposes of this paragraph, the term âenergy 738 efficiency improvementâ means any energy conservation and 739 efficiency improvement that reduces consumption through 740 conservation or a more efficient use of electricity, natural 741 gas, propane, or other forms of energy on the property, 742 including, but not limited to, air sealing; installation of 743 insulation; installation of energy-efficient heating, cooling, 744 or ventilation systems; installation of solar panels; building 745 modifications to increase the use of daylight or shade; 746 replacement of windows; installation of energy controls or 747 energy recovery systems; installation of electric vehicle 748 charging equipment; installation of systems for natural gas fuel 749 as defined in s. 206.9951; and installation of efficient 750 lighting equipment. 751 3.âNotwithstanding any other provision of this subsection, 752 a local government infrastructure surtax imposed or extended 753 after July 1, 1998, may allocate up to 15 percent of the surtax 754 proceeds for deposit into a trust fund within the countyâs 755 accounts created for the purpose of funding economic development 756 projects having a general public purpose of improving local 757 economies, including the funding of operational costs and 758 incentives related to economic development. The ballot statement 759 must indicate the intention to make an allocation under the 760 authority of this subparagraph. 761 4.âSurtax revenues that are shared with eligible charter 762 schools pursuant to paragraph (c) shall be allocated among such 763 schools based on each schoolâs proportionate share of total 764 school district capital outlay full-time equivalent enrollment 765 as adopted by the education estimating conference established in 766 s. 216.136. Surtax revenues must be expended by the charter 767 school in a manner consistent with the allowable uses provided 768 in s. 1013.62(4). All revenues and expenditures shall be 769 accounted for in a charter schoolâs monthly or quarterly 770 financial statement pursuant to s. 1002.33(9). If a schoolâs 771 charter is not renewed or is terminated and the school is 772 dissolved under the provisions of law under which the school was 773 organized, any unencumbered funds received under this paragraph 774 shall revert to the sponsor. 775 Section 9.âThe Legislature finds and declares that this act 776 fulfills an important state interest. 777 Section 10.âThis act shall take effect January 1, 2027.